Utah statutes.
53A-18-102.   Additional indebtedness -- Election.

A local school board may require the qualified electors of the district to vote on a proposition as to whether to incur indebtedness, subject to conditions provided in Title 11, Chapter 14, Local Government Bonding Act, under the following circumstances:

(1)  if the debts of the district are equal to school taxes and other estimated revenues for the school year, and it is necessary to create and incur additional indebtedness in order to maintain and support schools within the district; or

(2)  the local school board determines it advisable to issue school district bonds to purchase school sites, buildings, or furnishings or to improve existing school property.



Amended by Chapter 105, 2005 General Session

